extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX J   en          ni         den is:locative is:plural
SFX J   en          noch       [dz]en is:locative is:plural
SFX J   n           noch       [^dz]en is:locative is:plural
SFX J   er          roch       er is:locative is:plural
SFX J   or          roch       or is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [^o]r is:locative is:plural
SFX J   os          osoch      os is:locative is:plural
SFX J   et          toch       et is:locative is:plural
SFX J   oz          ozoch      oz is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [e][^clnr] is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [^celnrsz] is:locative is:plural
SFX J   iec         cami       iec is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   ec          cami       [^i]ec is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [^e]c is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   el          lami       el is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   ol          lami       ol is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           ami        [^eo]l is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   el          lami       [gz]el is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   en          nami       [dz]en is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [^dz]en is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   er          rami       er is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   or          rami       or is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           ami        [^o]r is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   os          osmi       os is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   et          tami       et is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   oz          ozmi       oz is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [e][^clnr] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [^celnrsz] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           a          [aadeeiillnoruuyy][sz] is:genitive
SFX J   0           ovi        lz is:dative
SFX J   0           ovi        lz is:locative
SFX J   0           u          [aadeeiillnoruuyy][sz] is:dative
SFX J   0           i          [aadeeiillnoruuyy][sz] is:locative
SFX J   0           om         [aadeeiillnoruuyy][sz] is:instrumental
SFX J   0           e          [aadeeiillnoruuyy][sz] is:nominative is:plural
SFX J   0           ov         [aaeeiillnoruuyy][sz] is:genitive is:plural
SFX J   0           om         [aadeeiillnoruuyy][sz] is:dative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [aadeeiillnoruuyy][sz] is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [aadeeiillnoruuyy][sz] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           ami        [lnr]s is:instrumental is:plural
SFX J   0           a          [aoouyy][ln] is:genitive
SFX J   0           a          [aoouyy][ln] is:accusative
SFX J   0           u          ial is:dative
SFX J   0           u          [aaooruyy][ln] is:dative
SFX J   l           li         [aaooruyy]l is:locative
SFX J   n           ni         [aaooruyy]n is:locative
SFX J   0           om         [aaooruyy][ln] is:instrumental
SFX J   l           le         [aaooruyy]l is:nominative is:plural
SFX J   n           ne         [aaooruyy]n is:nominative is:plural
SFX J   0           ov         [aaooruyy][ln] is:genitive is:plural
SFX J   0           om         [aaooruyy][ln] is:dative is:plural
SFX J   0           och        [aaooruyy][ln] is:locative is:plural
SFX J   0           mi         [aaooruyy][ln] is:instrumental is:plural

SFX L Y 77
SFX L   ec          ca         ec is:genitive
SFX L   o           a          o is:genitive
SFX L   0           a          [tv]er is:genitive
SFX L   er          ra         [^tv]er is:genitive
SFX L   0           a          [^e][cr] is:genitive
SFX L   es          sa         es is:genitive
SFX L   0           a          [^ceior] is:genitive
SFX L   us          a          us is:genitive
SFX L   ec          covi       ec is:dative
SFX L   0           vi         o is:dative
SFX L   0           ovi        [tv]er is:dative
SFX L   er          rovi       [^tv]er is:dative
SFX L   0           ovi        [^e][cr] is:dative
SFX L   es          sovi       es is:dative
SFX L   0           ovi        [^ceior] is:dative
SFX L   us          ovi        us is:dative
SFX L   o           a          o is:accusative
SFX L   ec          com        ec is:instrumental
SFX L   0           m          o is:instrumental
SFX L   0           om         [tv]er is:instrumental
SFX L   er          rom        [^tv]er is:instrumental
SFX L   0           om         [^e][cr] is:instrumental
SFX L   es          som        es is:instrumental
SFX L   0           om         [^ceior] is:instrumental
SFX L   us          om         us is:instrumental
SFX L   0           e          c is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   ec          ce         ec is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           via        o is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           e          ar is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [tv]er is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   er          re         [^tv]er is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [^ae][cr] is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   es          sy         es is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [^cceior] is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   us          y          us is:nominative is:plural
SFX L   ec          cov        ec is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   0           v          o is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   0           ov         [tv]er is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   er          rov        [^tv]er is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   0           ov         [^e][cr] is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   es          sov        es is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   0           ov         [^ceior] is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   us          ov         us is:genitive is:plural
SFX L   ec          com        ec is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           m          o is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           om         [tv]er is:dative is:plural
SFX L   er          rom        [^tv]er is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           om         [^e][cr] is:dative is:plural
SFX L   es          som        es is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           om         [^ceior] is:dative is:plural
SFX L   us          om         us is:dative is:plural
SFX L   0           e          c is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   ec          ce         ec is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   ec          cov        ec is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   0           v          o is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   0           e          ar is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [tv]er is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   er          re         [^tv]er is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   es          sov        es is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   0           y          [^cceior] is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   us          ov         us is:accusative is:plural
SFX L   ec          coch       ec is:locative is:plural
SFX L   0           ch         o is:locative is:plural
SFX L   0           och        [tv]er is:locative is:plural
SFX L   er          roch       [^tv]er is:locative is:plural
SFX L   0           och        [^e][cr] is:locative is:plural
SFX L   es          soch       es is:locative is:plural
SFX L   0           och        [^ceior] is:locative is:plural
SFX L   us          och        us is:locative is:plural
SFX L   ec          cami       ec is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   o           ami        o is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   0           mi         [tv]er is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   er          rami       [^tv]er is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   0           mi         [^e][cr] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   es          sami       es is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   0           mi         [^ceior] is:instrumental is:plural
SFX L   us          ami        us is:instrumental is:plural
