extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
Greenwich/J po:noun is:masculine
Kragujevac/J po:noun is:masculine
Paraguaj/J po:noun is:masculine
Trencin/J po:noun is:masculine
alabaster/J po:noun is:masculine
artikel/J po:noun is:masculine
baranok/L po:noun is:masculine
bedeker/J po:noun is:masculine
bezstavovec/L po:noun is:masculine
blsacinec/J po:noun is:masculine
bocian/L po:noun is:masculine
brontosaurus/L po:noun is:masculine
bunker/J po:noun is:masculine
byk/L po:noun is:masculine
capko/L po:noun is:masculine
cernobyl/J po:noun is:masculine
cerviacik/L po:noun is:masculine
chrustik/L po:noun is:masculine
ciagel/J po:noun is:masculine
ciz/L po:noun is:masculine
crviacik/L po:noun is:masculine
cuvac/L po:noun is:masculine
cviker/J po:noun is:masculine
datel/L po:noun is:masculine
dekoder/L po:noun is:masculine
denar/J po:noun is:masculine
dinosaurus/L po:noun is:masculine
domec/J po:noun is:masculine
dvojkopytnik/L po:noun is:masculine
fals/J po:noun is:masculine
frezovac/J po:noun is:masculine
grenadin/L po:noun is:masculine
had/L po:noun is:masculine
haj/J po:noun is:masculine
havkac/CL po:noun is:masculine
havran/L po:noun is:masculine
hlac/L po:noun is:masculine
hlavacik/L po:noun is:masculine
hluchan/L po:noun is:masculine
hnetac/J po:noun is:masculine
holan/L po:noun is:masculine
hrniec/J po:noun is:masculine
jarkovac/J po:noun is:masculine
jazvec/CL po:noun is:masculine
jezko/L po:noun is:masculine
jul/L po:noun is:masculine
kandelaber/J po:noun is:masculine
kilohertz/J po:noun is:masculine
kliest/L po:noun is:masculine
kocurik/L po:noun is:masculine
koja/J po:noun is:masculine
kokerspaniel/L po:noun is:masculine
kopov/L po:noun is:masculine
kortes/J po:noun is:masculine
kozol/L po:noun is:masculine
krab/L po:noun is:masculine
krc/J po:noun is:masculine
krtko/L po:noun is:masculine
krumpel/J po:noun is:masculine
kvetinac/J po:noun is:masculine
lemes/J po:noun is:masculine
levicek/L po:noun is:masculine
lizing/J po:noun is:masculine
los/L po:noun is:masculine
ludoop/L po:noun is:masculine
maco/L po:noun is:masculine
malinac/J po:noun is:masculine
medved/L po:noun is:masculine
medzistupen/J po:noun is:masculine
mililiter/J po:noun is:masculine
mliecnak/L po:noun is:masculine
motocykel/J po:noun is:masculine
mravec/CL po:noun is:masculine
nastrelovac/J po:noun is:masculine
nuchac/J po:noun is:masculine
odhrdzovac/J po:noun is:masculine
odprasovac/J po:noun is:masculine
ohen/J po:noun is:masculine
operenec/J po:noun is:masculine
osmonoh/L po:noun is:masculine
otvarac/J po:noun is:masculine
papagajec/J po:noun is:masculine
parohacik/L po:noun is:masculine
perforovac/J po:noun is:masculine
pes/L po:noun is:masculine
plamen/J po:noun is:masculine
podavac/J po:noun is:masculine
pointer/L po:noun is:masculine
polliter/J po:noun is:masculine
postroj/J po:noun is:masculine
prekryvac/J po:noun is:masculine
prijimac/J po:noun is:masculine
purpur/J po:noun is:masculine
rak/L po:noun is:masculine
razen/J po:noun is:masculine
retriever/L po:noun is:masculine
rod/J po:noun is:masculine
rozptylovac/J po:noun is:masculine
rus/L po:noun is:masculine
ruz/J po:noun is:masculine
rys/L po:noun is:masculine
samec/CL po:noun is:masculine
semenac/J po:noun is:masculine
silomer/J po:noun is:masculine
simpanz/L po:noun is:masculine
skorec/CL po:noun is:masculine
skripec/J po:noun is:masculine
sled/L po:noun is:masculine
slimak/L po:noun is:masculine
smrnc/J po:noun is:masculine
snoubording/L po:noun is:masculine
somar/L po:noun is:masculine
splynovac/J po:noun is:masculine
srsen/L po:noun is:masculine
stazen/J po:noun is:masculine
stoziar/J po:noun is:masculine
strkac/L po:noun is:masculine
suchar/J po:noun is:masculine
sumec/CL po:noun is:masculine
taj/J po:noun is:masculine
tatos/L po:noun is:masculine
terier/L po:noun is:masculine
tetrov/L po:noun is:masculine
toliar/J po:noun is:masculine
trilobit/L po:noun is:masculine
tyzden/J po:noun is:masculine
ulitnik/L po:noun is:masculine
uzlovac/J po:noun is:masculine
videonahravac/J po:noun is:masculine
vlk/L po:noun is:masculine
vorvan/L po:noun is:masculine
vrkoc/J po:noun is:masculine
vtak/L po:noun is:masculine
vysavac/J po:noun is:masculine
zahrievac/J po:noun is:masculine
zajac/L po:noun is:masculine
zajo/L po:noun is:masculine
zavinac/L po:noun is:masculine
zaznamenavac/J po:noun is:masculine
zltochvost/L po:noun is:masculine
zosilnovac/J po:noun is:masculine
zubor/L po:noun is:masculine
